District of Columbia statutes.
23-547

Procedure for authorization or approval of interception of wire or oral communications.

(a)

Each application for an order authorizing or approving the interception of a wire or oral communication shall be made in writing upon oath or affirmation to a judge and shall state the applicant’s authority to make the application. Each application shall include —

(1)

the identity of the investigative or law enforcement officer making the application, and the officer authorizing the application;

(2)

a full and complete statement of the facts and circumstances relied upon by the applicant to justify his belief that an order should be issued, including (A) details as to the particular offense that has been, is being, or is about to be committed, (B) a particular description of the nature and location of the facilities from which or the place where the communication is to be or was intercepted, (C) a particular description of the type of communications sought to be or which were intercepted, and (D) the identity of the person, if known, who committed, is committing, or is about to commit the offense and whose communications are to be or were intercepted;

(3)

a full and complete statement as to whether or not other investigative procedures have been tried and failed or why they reasonably appear or appeared to be unlikely to succeed if tried or to be too dangerous;

(4)

a statement of the period of time for which the interception is or was required to be maintained, and if the nature of the investigation is or was such that the authorization for interception should not automatically terminate or should not have automatically terminated when the described type of communication has been or was first obtained, a particular description of facts establishing probable cause to believe that additional communications of the same type will or would occur thereafter;

(5)

a full and complete statement of the facts concerning all previous applications, known to the individual authorizing or making the application, made to any judge for authorization to intercept, or for approval of interceptions of, wire or oral communications involving any of the same persons, facilities, or places specified in the application, and the action taken by the judge on each such application; and

(6)

where the application is for the extension of an order, a statement setting forth the results thus far obtained from the interception, or a reasonable explanation of the failure to obtain results.

(b)

The judge may require the applicant to furnish additional testimony or documentary evidence in support of the application.

(c)

Upon application the judge may enter an ex parte order, as requested or as modified, authorizing or approving interception of wire or oral communications within the District of Columbia, if the judge determines on the basis of the facts submitted by the applicant that —

(1)

there is or was probable cause for belief that the person whose communication is to be or was interpreted is or was committing, has committed, or is about to commit a particular offense enumerated in section 23-546;

(2)

there is or was probable cause for belief that particular communications concerning that offense will or would be obtained through the interception;

(3)

normal investigative procedures have or would have been tried and have or had failed or reasonably appear or appeared to be unlikely to succeed if tried or to be too dangerous; and

(4)

there is or was probable cause for belief that the facilities from which, or the place where, the wire or oral communications are to be or were intercepted were used, are being used, or are about to be used, in connection with the commission of the offense, or are or were leased to, listed in the name of, or commonly used by the person referred to in paragraph (1).

(d)

If the facilities from which a wire communication is to be or was intercepted are or were being used by, are or were about to be used by, or are or were leased to, listed in the name of, or commonly used by, a licensed physician, a licensed attorney, or practicing clergyman, or if the place where an oral communication is to be or was intercepted is or was a place used primarily for habitation by spouses or domestic partners, or primarily by a licensed physician, licensed attorney, or practicing clergyman for his own professional purposes, no order authorizing or approving such interception may be issued unless the court, in addition to the matters provided in subsection (c) of this section, determines that —

(1)

such facilities or place are or were being used or are or were about to be used in connection with conspiratorial activities characteristic of organized crime; and

(2)

such interceptions will be so conducted as to minimize or eliminate the number of interceptions of privileged wire or oral communications between licensed physicians and patients, licensed attorneys and clients, practicing clergymen and confidants, and spouses or domestic partners.

No otherwise privileged wire or oral communication intercepted in accordance with, or in violation of, the provisions of this subchapter shall lose its privileged character.

(e)

Each order authorizing or approving the interception of any wire or oral communication shall specify —

(1)

the identity of the person, if known, or otherwise a particular description of the person, if known, whose communications are to be or were intercepted;

(2)

the nature and location of the communication facilities as to which, or the place where, authority to intercept or any approval of interception is or was granted;

(3)

a particular description of the type of communication sought to be or which was intercepted, and a statement of the particular offense to which it relates;

(4)

the identity of the agency authorized to intercept or whose interception is approved, and of the person authorizing the application; and

(5)

the period of time during or for which the interception is authorized or approved, including a statement as to whether or not the interception shall automatically terminate when the described communication has been first obtained.

(f)

An order authorizing the interception of a wire or oral communication shall, upon request of the applicant, direct that a communication common carrier, landlord, custodian, or other person shall furnish the applicant forthwith all information, facilities, or technical assistance necessary to accomplish the interception unobtrusively and with a minimum of interference with the services that such carrier, landlord, custodian, or person is according the person whose communications are to be intercepted. Any communication common carrier, landlord, custodian, or other person furnishing such facilities or technical assistance shall be compensated therefore by the applicant at the prevailing rates.

(g)

No order entered under this section may authorize or approve the interception of any wire or oral communication for any period longer than is necessary to achieve the objective of the authorization, nor in any event longer than thirty days. Extensions of an order may be granted, but only upon application for an extension made in accordance with subsection (a) of this section and the court making the findings required by subsection (c) of this section. The period of extension shall be no longer than the authorizing judge deems necessary to achieve the purposes for which it was granted and in no event for longer than thirty days. Every order and extension thereof shall contain a provision that the authorization to intercept shall be executed as soon as practicable, shall be conducted in such a way as to minimize or eliminate the interception of communications not otherwise subject to interception under this subchapter, and must terminate upon attainment of the authorized objective, or in any event in thirty days.

(h)

Whenever an order authorizing interception is entered pursuant to this subchapter, the order may require reports to be made to the judge who issued the order showing what progress has been made toward achievement of the authorized objective and the need for continued interception. Reports shall be made at such intervals as the judge may require.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 621, Pub. L. 91-358, title II, § 210(a)
May 22, 1998, D.C. Law 12-114, § 3(a), 45 DCR 486
Sept. 12, 2008, D.C. Law 17-231, § 24(b), 55 DCR 6758
D.C. Law 17-231, in subsec. (d), substituted “spouses or domestic partners,” for “a husband and wife” in the lead-in language, and substituted “spouses or domestic partners” for “husbands and wives” in par. (2).
1973 Ed., § 23-547.
1981 Ed., § 23-547.
This section is referenced in § 23-551, § 23-555, and § 23-556.